New York, session 2025-2026, S5441.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 27-0703 of the environmental conservation law is 2 amended by adding a new subdivision 7 to read as follows: 3 7. The department shall undertake a review of the regulations govern- 4 ing the permitting of landfills and transfer stations, including siting 5 and expansion, to ensure that such regulations integrate the latest 6 scientific information regarding the impacts of such facilities on 7 vulnerable populations such as children and seniors, disadvantaged 8 communities, water, and the environment. On or before March thirty- 9 first, two thousand twenty-seven, the department of environmental 10 conservation shall post a report containing the findings from such 11 review on its website. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03036-01-5